New York, session 2025-2026, S2200.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. In the city of New York, where the municipality or its 2 departments by acts of omission or commission either creates or greatly 3 contributes to an environmental crisis which impacts a sizable segment 4 of its citizens, creating property damage and threatening residents' 5 health, and where such municipality or its departments either owns or 6 controls the infrastructure that can substantially mitigate this envi- 7 ronmental issue and bring relief to those residents, then such munici- 8 pality shall be required and directed to utilize that infrastructure to 9 provide a clear, objective and quantifiable plan to obtain relief in a 10 timely manner. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04930-01-5